Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.130

Quorum—Vote on allowance of claims.

A majority of the board of trustees shall constitute a quorum, and no business shall be transacted when a majority is not present, and no claim shall be allowed where a majority of the board has not voted favorably thereon.

[ 1945 c 261 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-27. Prior: 1935 c 121 s 2; RRS s 9578-2.]